Washington statutes.
RCW 12.16.020

Service of subpoena.

A subpoena may be served by any person above the age of eighteen years, by reading it to the witness, or by delivering to him or her a copy at his or her usual place of abode.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3027; Code 1881 s 1870; 1873 p 370 s 169; 1854 p 233 s 58; RRS s 1899.]